Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 1
ADMINISTRATION OF PROGRAM

23-3.1-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby declares that the availability of improved access to and choice of higher education opportunities in this state will benefit the residents of this state and that the establishment of a student loan program will assist such residents in meeting the expenses incurred in availing themselves of such opportunities.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 807, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 617, § 1, effective April 10.

23-3.1-102. Definitions.

As used in this article 3.1 or in the specified portion of this article 3.1, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Borrower" means any person who receives a loan made, originated, disbursed, serviced, or guaranteed by the division, or made, purchased, originated, disbursed, or serviced by collegeinvest, created by part 2 of this article, or made from or in anticipation of an institutional loan as defined in section 23-3.1-202 by one or more institutions of higher education or a nonprofit corporation acting on behalf of one or more institutions of higher education.

(1.3) "Clock hour" means a period of time that is the equivalent of:

A fifty-to-sixty-minute class, lecture, or recitation; or

A fifty-to-sixty-minute faculty-supervised laboratory, shop training, or internship.

(1.5) "Commission" means the Colorado commission on higher education.

"Department" means the department of higher education.

"Director", as used in this part 1, means the director of the division.

"Division" means the student loan division in the department which shall constitute the successor division for all obligations incurred by the loan guarantee division formerly established by this part 1.

(4.2) "Educational loan" means a student loan which is:

Secured in such manner as the division or the authority created by part 2 of this article deems appropriate or prudent; and

Not authorized by Title IV, Part B of the federal "Higher Education Act of 1965", as amended.

(4.5) "Guaranteed student loan" means a student loan authorized by Title IV, Part B of the federal "Higher Education Act of 1965", as amended.

"Institution of higher education" means an educational institution which meets all of the following criteria:

It admits as regular students persons having a certificate of graduation from a school providing secondary education or comparable qualifications and persons for enrollment in courses which they reasonably may be expected to complete successfully or persons who have the ability to benefit from the training offered;

It is a college, university, or community or local district college inside the United States which is either accredited by a nationally recognized accrediting agency or association or, if not so accredited, meets the alternative criteria set forth in the federal "Higher Education Act of 1965", as amended, 20 U.S.C. sec. 1085 (b); or

It is a vocational or occupational school inside the United States which is either accredited by a nationally recognized accrediting agency or association or meets the criteria set forth in the federal "Higher Education Act of 1965", as amended, 20 U.S.C. sec. 1085 (c)(4), and, in the case of private occupational schools located in Colorado, holds a certificate of approval as required by article 64 of this title 23;

It provides an educational program for which it awards a bachelor's degree; or

It provides not less than a two-year program which is acceptable for full credit towards such a degree; or

It provides not less than a one-year program of training to prepare students for gainful employment in a recognized occupation; or

It is a private occupational school providing a program of not less than three hundred clock hours of classroom instruction or its equivalent to prepare students for gainful employment in a recognized occupation.

"Lender" means any bank operating under a national or state charter, any domestic savings and loan association operating under a national or state charter, any domestic branch or agency of a foreign bank duly licensed by a state or the United States, any credit union established pursuant to federal law or the law of the state in which its principal place of operation is established, any insurance company authorized to do business within this state, any institution of higher education that applies for and receives formal approval of the division as an eligible lender pursuant to the rules of the division, any pension fund eligible under the federal "Higher Education Act of 1965", 20 U.S.C. 1071 et seq., as amended, any secondary market operation established pursuant to the federal "Education Amendments of 1972", as amended, or the authority created by part 2 of this article.

"Resident" means any person attending an institution of higher education in Colorado, any person attending an institution of higher education outside Colorado who would qualify for Colorado in-state tuition status under article 7 of this title, or any person attending an institution of higher education outside Colorado who has applied for a loan from a lender approved by the division.

"Resident" includes a parent of any person specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (7) if such person is a dependent of such parent.

"Student loan" means a loan made to finance higher education opportunities or to consolidate or refinance loans made to finance higher education opportunities, which loan is made, originated, disbursed, or serviced by the division or by collegeinvest, created pursuant to part 2 of this article, or which one or more institutions of higher education or a nonprofit corporation acting on behalf of one or more institutions of higher education may make from or in anticipation of an institutional loan as defined in section 23-3.1-202 or which is guaranteed by the division and may include guaranteed student loans and educational loans.

Source:

.

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 807, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(1) R&RE, (1.5) added, and (7) amended, p. 1087, §§ 1, 2, effective May 29; (5)(b) and (5)(c)(IV) amended, p. 852, § 26, effective July 1.

L. 82:

(1.3) added and (5)(c)(IV) amended, p. 342, § 1, effective March 22.

L. 83:

(5)(a) and (5)(b) amended, p. 782, § 1, effective April 5; (6) amended, p. 784, § 1, effective April 5.

L. 84:

(1) and (4) R&RE, (4.2), (4.5), and (8) added, and (6) amended, p. 617, 618, §§ 2, 3, effective April 10; (6) amended, p. 376, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(7)(a) amended, p. 773, § 2, effective April 5.

L. 2000:

IP and (3) amended, p. 1296, § 17, effective May 26.

L. 2004:

(1), (6), and (8) amended, p. 558, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

IP and (5)(b)(II) amended, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1205, § 11, effective August 9.

23-3.1-103. Division created - director - staff.

The student loan division and the office of the director of the division are created in the department of higher education. The division and the office of the director of the division are type 2 entities, as defined in section 24-1-105, and exercise their powers and perform their duties and functions under the department. The director of collegeinvest is the director of the division. The director, with the approval of the executive director of the commission, shall employ such professional and clerical personnel as deemed necessary to carry out the duties and functions of the division. The director and professional personnel hold educational offices and are exempt from the state personnel system.

Personnel hired by the director, with the approval of the executive director of the commission, on and after July 1, 2002, to carry out the duties and functions of the division shall receive compensation for their services as determined by the director. Such personnel are declared to hold educational offices and to be exempt from the state personnel system but shall, by acceptance of employment, be subject to the provisions of article 51 of title 24, C.R.S.

Any personnel hired within the state personnel system pursuant to subsection (1) of this section prior to July 1, 2002, shall retain all rights related to state personnel system and retirement benefits under the laws of this state until termination of employment with the division; except that, if such personnel accept a promotion, a voluntary demotion, or a transfer for purposes of a change of duties performed for the benefit of the division, such personnel shall become exempt from the state personnel system. Nothing in this subsection (3) shall prohibit personnel hired prior to July 1, 2002, from continuing membership in the public employees' retirement association pursuant to the provisions of article 51 of title 24, C.R.S., with all attendant rights and duties.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 808, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 618, § 4, effective April 10.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 961, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 511, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3354, § 12, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

23-3.1-103.5. Enterprise status of division.

The division shall constitute an enterprise for the purposes of section 20 of article X of the state constitution so long as the division retains the authority to issue revenue bonds and the division receives less than ten percent of its total annual revenues in grants from all Colorado state and local governments combined.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2006, p. 511, § 2, effective July 1, 2006.)

Repealed.

As used in this section, "grant" means any direct cash subsidy or other direct contribution of money from the state or any local government in Colorado which is not required to be repaid.

"Grant" does not include:

Any indirect benefit conferred upon the division from the state or any local government in Colorado;

Any revenues resulting from rates, fees, assessments, or other charges imposed by the division for the provision of goods or services by the division;

Any federal funds, regardless of whether such federal funds pass through the state or any local government in Colorado prior to receipt by the division.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 1827, § 11, effective June 6.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 100, § 3, effective March 18.

L. 95:

(3) added, p. 717, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2000:

(3) repealed, p. 29, § 1, effective March 10.

L. 2006:

(1)(a), (1)(b), and (1)(c) amended, p. 511, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (1)(d)(II) provided for the repeal of subsection (1)(d), effective July l, 1994. (See L. 94, p. 100.)

23-3.1-104. Duties and powers of division - rules.

The division shall:

Promulgate rules and regulations for administration of the Colorado student loan program established by this article, including but not limited to the following:

Criteria for eligibility of borrowers, lenders, and institutions of higher education to participate in the network;

Procedures to be followed by participating borrowers, lenders, and institutions of higher education;

With the advice of the authority created by part 2 of this article, procedures and criteria by which the powers of the division pursuant to section 23-3.1-104.5 may be exercised;

Approve or arrange for approval of loan applications for guarantee;

Establish the level of the insurance premium charged to borrowers of guaranteed student loans, not to exceed the amount permitted by federal law;

Assist lenders in seeking payment from delinquent borrowers;

Purchase defaulted guaranteed student loans promptly;

Collect or provide for the collection of defaulted guaranteed student loans purchased from lenders;

Repealed.

Train lenders in the requirements of the network;

Evaluate lender performance in the network;

Train personnel of institutions of higher education in the requirements of the network;

Evaluate the performance of institutions of higher education in the network;

Educate borrowers in the requirements of the network;

Communicate on a periodic basis with borrowers to inform them of the status of their loans;

Bill the federal government for administrative allowances and reinsurance payments;

Repealed.

At times prescribed by the department of revenue, but not less frequently than annually, certify to the department of revenue information regarding persons who owe a loan repayment to the division, the amount of which has been determined to be owing as a result of a final agency determination or judicial decision pursuant to section 39-21-108 (3), C.R.S., or which has been reduced to judgment.

Such information shall include the name and social security number of the person owing the debt, the amount of the debt, and any other identifying information required by the department of revenue.

Upon notification by the department of revenue of amounts deposited with the state treasurer pursuant to section 39-21-108 (3), C.R.S., the state treasurer shall disburse such amounts to the division.

At least quarterly, certify to the controller information regarding persons who owe a loan repayment to the division.

Such information shall include the name and social security number of the person owing the debt, the amount of the debt, and any other identifying information required by the controller.

Upon notification by the controller to the state agency of amounts deposited with the state treasurer pursuant to section 24-30-202.4 (3.5)(a)(V), C.R.S., the state treasurer shall disburse such amounts to the division.

The division may:

Permit lenders to require cosigners;

Provide incentives to lenders, which may include but are not limited to:

Billing the federal government for interest payments owed to lenders;

Preparing federal reports required of lenders;

Guaranteeing, originating, servicing, making, and purchasing consolidation loans and refinancing loans pursuant to the provisions of section 23-3.1-112;

Verifying in-school status of students;

Employ legal counsel;

Garnish wages of defaulted borrowers;

Enter into contracts and guarantee agreements with approved lenders, approved institutions of higher education, state and federal governmental agencies, and corporations, including agreements for federal insurance of losses resulting from death, default, bankruptcy, or total and permanent disability of borrowers. Contracts with corporations to provide services shall clearly specify the role and duties of such corporations and may be entered into without regard to the provisions of the "Procurement Code", articles 101 to 112 of title 24, C.R.S., without regard to the provisions of section 17-24-111, C.R.S., and without regard to the provisions of part 11 of article 30 of title 24, C.R.S.

Make, originate, disburse, service, or guarantee student loans;

Establish the level of insurance premium or interest rate charged to the borrowers of student loans;

Purchase defaulted student loans;

Collect or provide for the collection of defaulted student loans purchased from lenders;

Repealed.

Advise the commission and the department on matters pertaining to student loans;

Make and enter into contracts and all other instruments necessary or convenient for the exercise of its powers and functions pursuant to this part 1 without regard to the provisions of the "Procurement Code", articles 101 to 112 of title 24, C.R.S., without regard to the provisions of section 17-24-111, C.R.S., and without regard to the provisions of part 11 of article 30 of title 24, C.R.S.;

Do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this part 1;

Repealed.

Require a lender or institution of higher education to take reasonable corrective action to remedy a violation of applicable laws, regulations, special arrangements, agreements, or limitations, including but not limited to requiring such lender or institution to make payments to the secretary of the United States department of education, the division, or their designated recipients of any funds that the lender or institution improperly received, withheld, or disbursed or caused to be disbursed;

Establish an investigations unit, which shall have the following powers and duties:

To conduct investigations, as it deems necessary, to determine whether applications and other data submitted to the division contain any misrepresentations or false statements made for the purpose of cheating or defrauding and to locate defaulted borrowers;

To investigate, as it deems necessary, alleged violations of any state or federal criminal statute related to fraud committed by any person who has obtained or attempted to obtain or who aids, assists, or abets in obtaining or attempting to obtain student loans or loan guarantees or other money from the division;

To work in conjunction with the appropriate law enforcement and prosecuting authorities in the investigation and prosecution of cases where evidence of criminal activity exists;

To request and obtain information, assistance, and data from any department, division, board, bureau, commission, or other agency of the local, state, or federal government, including, but not limited to, arrest and conviction records available from any law enforcement agency or crime information center pursuant to the provisions of part 3 of article 72 of title 24, C.R.S.

All rules promulgated by the division pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section are subject to section 24-4-103. Any guarantee made pursuant to any rule continues to be governed by the rule in effect at the time when the guarantee was made, whether or not the rule has been continued.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 808, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 80:

(3) amended, p. 787, § 20, effective June 5.

L. 81:

(1)(a)(I), (1)(a)(II), (1)(c), (1)(l), (1)(m), (1)(o), and (2)(e) amended, p. 1087, § 3, effective May 29.

L. 84:

(1)(p) added and (2)(d) amended, p. 1008, §§ 1, 2, effective March 29; (2)(f) to (2)(o) added, p. 619, 1008, §§ 5, 2, 6, effective April 10.

L. 85:

(2)(p) added, p. 773, § 4, effective April 5; (2)(q) added, p. 776, § 1, effective April 30.

L. 87:

(2)(b)(III) amended, p. 845, § 1, effective February 26.

L. 97:

(1)(q) added, p. 941, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(2)(e) and (2)(m) amended, p. 962, § 2, effective June 1; (1)(p)(I) amended, p. 100, § 2, effective August 7.

L. 2004:

IP(1)(a), (1)(a)(I), (1)(g), (1)(h), (1)(i), (1)(j), (1)(k), (1)(l), (2)(j), and (2)(o) amended, pp. 578, 559, §§ 38, 2, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

IP(1)(a) amended, p. 512, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(1)(g), (1)(o), (2)(j), (2)(k), and (2)(o) repealed, (HB 10-1428), ch. 390, p. 1829, § 4, effective June 9.

L. 2022:

(3) amended, (SB 22-091), ch. 28, p. 168, § 4, effective August 10.

23-3.1-104.5. Additional powers of division.

The division is hereby authorized to make, originate, disburse, or service student loans directly to residents. "Resident" for the purpose of this section means any person attending an institution of higher education in Colorado, or any person attending an institution of higher education outside Colorado who would qualify for Colorado in-state tuition status under article 7 of this title. In order to obtain funds to make, originate, disburse, or service such student loans, the division is authorized to borrow or enter into other types of agreements with any person, corporation, financial institution, state or federal authority, political subdivision, or state or federal government agency for the advancement of funds for such purposes, so long as such student loans are insured against default.

(1.5) Repealed.

Any agreement made by the division to repay funds borrowed from any person, corporation, financial institution, state or federal authority, political subdivision, or state or federal government agency shall not constitute or become an indebtedness, a debt, or a liability of the state or constitute the giving, pledging, or loaning of the full faith and credit of the state. Repayment of such borrowed funds shall be made solely from funds received from proceeds or earnings derived from the funds borrowed, from borrowers and insurers, or from federal payments, and the state shall have no liability with respect to such an agreement.

The division is hereby authorized to issue revenue bonds after approval by both houses of the general assembly either by bill or by joint resolution and after approval by the governor in accordance with section 39 of article V of the state constitution.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire section added, p. 1088, § 4, effective May 29.

L. 84:

Entire section amended p. 619, § 7, effective April 10.

L. 85:

(1) R&RE, (1.5) repealed, and (2) amended, pp. 774, 775, §§ 5, 10, 6, effective April 5.

L. 93:

(3) added, p. 1827, § 12, effective June 6.

L. 2006:

(3) amended, p. 513, § 6, effective July 1.

23-3.1-104.7. Restructuring plan - legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

Due to changes in federal law, the department shall no longer be involved in student loans that are guaranteed by the federal government;

There are a number of employees of the division that are involved in originating, disbursing, servicing, and administering student loans that are guaranteed by the federal government; and

It is in the best interest of the state for the department to prepare and submit to the general assembly a restructuring plan to deal with the changes in administering student loans.

On or before January 1, 2011, the department shall prepare and submit to the education committees of the senate and the house of representatives, or any successor committees, a restructuring plan to deal with changes in administering student loans. The plan shall address, but need not be limited to, the following issues:

Any ongoing or future role for the Colorado student obligation bond authority;

Whether the division should continue to originate, disburse, service, guarantee, and administer student loans;

If the division does not continue administering student loans, the entity that should be responsible for such administration and the authority that entity may need;

The number of employees necessary to administer student loans; and

The employment of persons who formerly were responsible for administering student loans guaranteed by the federal government.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1428), ch. 390, p. 1827, § 1, effective June 9.

23-3.1-105. Advisory committee established - duties - membership - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 810, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

IP(1) amended, p. 620, § 8, effective April 10.

L. 86:

(3) added, p. 413, § 21, effective March 21.

L. 91:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 695, § 8, effective April 20.

L. 2004:

Entire section R&RE, p. 372, § 1, effective April 8.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 512, § 3, effective July 1.

23-3.1-106. Student loan program established.

There is hereby established a student loan program, to be administered by the division, which shall guarantee, in accordance with applicable provisions of federal law, a percentage of the unpaid principal and interest on all guaranteed student loans approved by the division. No guaranteed student loan shall be guaranteed to a percentage or an amount in excess of the limits authorized by federal law, nor shall interest charged on any guaranteed student loan exceed the interest rate permitted by federal law, but each guaranteed student loan may carry a special loan insurance premium which shall not exceed that permitted by federal law. No guaranteed student loan shall be guaranteed or made to any borrower which would not be eligible for federal reinsurance as authorized by Title IV, Part B of the federal "Higher Education Act of 1965", as amended. A loan guarantee made by the division in good faith for a student loan which has been disbursed and which does not meet the requirements of this article, except for cases of misfeasance by the holder, shall not be invalidated.

On and after July 1, 2006, the student loan program established pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall be formally and legally known as and designated the Colorado student loan program. On and after July 1, 2006, whenever the student loan program or the guaranteed student loan program is referred to or designated by a contract or other document, such reference or designation shall be deemed to apply to the Colorado student loan program. All contracts entered into by or on behalf of the student loan program or the guaranteed student loan program prior to July 1, 2006, are hereby validated as obligations of the Colorado student loan program.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the Colorado student loan program established by subsection (1) of this section shall operate in such a manner that its costs can be fully met by user fees and federal payments.

Loan guarantees made by the division shall not constitute or become an indebtedness, a debt, or a liability of the state, nor shall such loan guarantees constitute the giving, pledging, or loaning of the full faith and credit of the state. The state shall have no liability with respect to loan guarantees which shall be payable solely from the user fees and federal payments provided for in section 23-3.1-107.

The loan guarantees shall not obligate the state, directly, indirectly, or contingently, nor empower the state or the general assembly to levy or collect any form of taxes or assessments, to create any indebtedness payable out of taxes or assessments, or to make any appropriation for their payment, and any such appropriation, levy, or collection is prohibited. Nothing in this part 1 shall be construed to authorize the division to create a debt of the state within the meaning of the constitution or statutes of Colorado or to authorize the division to levy or collect any form of taxes or assessments.

The state shall not be liable in any event for the purchase of defaulted loans made, originated, disbursed, serviced, or guaranteed by the division or for the performance of any pledge, obligation, or agreement of any kind in connection with such loans which may be undertaken by the division except from the user fees and federal payments provided for in section 23-3.1-107. No breach of any such pledge, obligation, or agreement shall impose any pecuniary liability upon the state or a charge upon the general credit or taxing power of the state.

On and after July 1, 2015, the Colorado student loan program may enter into an agreement with the department or another state entity to administer all or part of the college opportunity fund program created in parts 1 and 2 of article 18 of this title 23.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 811, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(3)(c) amended, p. 1088, § 5, effective May 29.

L. 84:

(1), (2), and (3)(c) amended, p. 620, § 9, effective April 10.

L. 85:

(1) amended, p. 774, § 7, effective April 5.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 453, § 1, effective March 29.

L. 2004:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 559, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(b) and (2) amended, p. 513, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(4) added, (HB 17-1131), ch. 29, p. 84, § 2, effective March 8.

23-3.1-106.5. Special funds.

The division may create a special fund into which any funds borrowed from any person, corporation, financial institution, state or federal authority, political subdivision, or state or federal agency pursuant to the provisions of section 23-3.1-104.5 (1) may be deposited.

(1.5) Repealed.

All moneys deposited or paid into any special fund established by this section shall be continuously available and are hereby appropriated to the division to be expended in accordance with the provisions of this article. Any income from the investment of this special fund shall be deposited in such fund.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1089, § 6, effective May 29.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 621, § 10, effective April 10.

L. 85:

(1) amended and (1.5) repealed, p. 775, §§ 8, 10, effective April 5.

23-3.1-107. Student loan guarantee fund - created.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a fund to be known as the student loan guarantee fund that shall contain:

A reserve account for guaranteed student loans that is established to fulfill the functions of the federal student loan reserve fund established by section 422A of the federal "Higher Education Act of 1965", as amended;

An operating account that is established to fulfill the functions of the agency operating fund established by section 422B of the federal "Higher Education Act of 1965", as amended;

A loan servicing account; and

Such other accounts as the division may require.

The reserve account shall be used only for those purposes permitted by section 422A of the federal "Higher Education Act of 1965", as amended. All moneys required to be deposited by the division in the federal student loan reserve fund created by said act shall be deposited in the reserve account. The division shall maintain at all times a minimum reserve requirement that is equal to, and calculated in the same manner as, that which is required for the federal student loan reserve fund established by said act. Such minimum reserve requirement may be maintained in cash in such account or in federal reinsurance receivables held by the division.

The operating account shall be used only for those purposes permitted by section 422B of the federal "Higher Education Act of 1965", as amended. All moneys required to be deposited by the division in the agency operating fund created by said act shall be deposited in the operating account.

The loan servicing account shall be used for the deposit of revenues generated by the division's loan servicing activities and for the payment of expenses related to those activities. Until such time as the division has reached agreement with the federal department of education as to the monetary amount of any federal interest in the loan servicing account, and has made arrangements to satisfy that interest, moneys in the loan servicing account shall be considered the property of the United States. After any federal interest in the loan servicing account has been satisfied pursuant to the agreement, all revenues remaining in the loan servicing account, after payment of expenses attributable to the account, may be transferred to either the operating account or the reserve account for such uses as are permitted for those accounts.

Other income earned or received by the division that is not required to be deposited in the reserve account or the loan servicing account may be deposited in the operating account, which shall be used to pay staff compensation and other expenses of the division.

Repealed.

All moneys deposited or paid into the student loan guarantee fund, including any interest earned from the investment of this fund and income earned or received by the division, shall be continuously available and are hereby appropriated to the division to be expended in accordance with the provisions of this article. Any income or interest earned from the investment of this fund shall be credited to the student loan guarantee fund. Such investment income or interest, together with any other income earned or received by the division, shall be apportioned to each account as required by applicable law and may be used only for the purposes permitted thereby.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 811, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

Entire section R&RE, p. 621, § 11, effective April 10.

L. 85:

(1)(b) amended, p. 775, § 9, effective April 5.

L. 91:

(1)(b) amended, p. 590, § 1, effective March 28.

L. 2001:

(1) R&RE and (2) amended, pp. 165, 166, §§ 1, 2, effective March 28.

L. 2004:

(1)(f) repealed, p. 202, § 18, effective August 4.

23-3.1-108. Age qualification.

Any person otherwise qualifying for a student loan shall not be disqualified to receive a student loan under the Colorado student loan program by reason of being under the age of eighteen years. For the purpose of applying for, receiving, and repaying a student loan, any person shall be deemed to have full legal capacity to act and shall have all the rights, powers, privileges, and obligations of a person of legal age with respect thereto.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 812, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 622, § 12, effective April 10.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 578, § 39, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 513, § 8, effective July 1.

23-3.1-109. Subject to audit.

The Colorado student loan program shall be audited annually by the state auditor.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 812, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 341, § 4, effective March 27.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 622, § 13, effective April 10.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1238, § 83, effective August 7.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 849, § 3, effective May 24.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 578, § 40, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 513, § 9, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1996 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 237, Session Laws of Colorado 1996.

23-3.1-110. Designation as sole state agency.

The division is the agency authorized to enter into contracts concerning the programs established by Title IV, Part B of the federal "Higher Education Act of 1965", 20 U.S.C. 1071, as amended. To the extent any fiscal policies required by the federal "Higher Education Act of 1965", 20 U.S.C. 1071, as amended, are in conflict with state fiscal policies, the division shall comply with the required federal policies.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 812, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 578, § 37, effective July 1.

23-3.1-111. Authority of division to enter into agreements to provide administrative and guarantee services.

The division is hereby authorized to enter into contracts or other agreements or both contracts and other agreements with private or public entities to make, originate, disburse, or service guaranteed student loans, educational loans, and student loans. Such authorization includes but shall not be limited to the power to enter into agreements with collegeinvest, established by part 2 of this article, to make, originate, disburse, or service "institutional loans" and "student obligations" as those terms are defined in section 23-3.1-202, whether or not such "institutional loans" and "student obligations" are eligible for federal reinsurance as authorized by Title IV, Part B of the federal "Higher Education Act of 1965", as amended.

The division may enter into contracts or other agreements or both contracts and other agreements with private or public entities to guarantee or reinsure student loans or educational loans which may include but not be limited to guaranteeing or reinsuring the "institutional loans" or "student obligations" as those terms are defined in section 23-3.1-202.

No guarantee or reinsurance agreement made by the division pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall constitute or become an indebtedness, a debt, or a liability of the state, nor shall such loan guarantee constitute the giving, pledging, or loaning of the full faith and credit of the state.

All income and interest thereon earned pursuant to the exercise of the power established in subsections (1) and (2) of this section are continuously available and are hereby appropriated to the division and may be used to pay the operating expenses thereof, or a portion of such income or interest may be deposited into any applicable reserve or guarantee account.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire section added, p. 622, § 14, effective April 10.

L. 2004:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 560, § 4, effective July 1.

23-3.1-112. Authority and power of the division to guarantee, originate, service, make, and purchase consolidation loans and refinancing loans.

Notwithstanding any provisions or definitions contained in this article to the contrary, the division is hereby authorized to guarantee, originate, service, make, and purchase consolidation loans and refinancing loans for all persons eligible for the consolidation and refinancing of student loans under Part B of Title IV of the federal "Higher Education Act of 1965", as amended. For the purposes of this section, "student loans" means, notwithstanding any provisions of this article to the contrary, those loans eligible for consolidation and refinancing under the federal provisions of Part B of Title IV of the "Higher Education Act of 1965", as amended.

The powers and duties of the division specified in section 23-3.1-104 shall also pertain to the authority of the division with respect to consolidation loans and refinancing loans under this section.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 845, § 2, effective February 26.